Hawaii statutes.
[§206M-22] Limitation on liability.
Chapters 661 and 662 or any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, nothing
in this chapter shall create an obligation, debt, claim, cause of action, claim
for relief, charge, or any other liability of any kind whatsoever in favor of
any person or entity, against the State or its officers and employees, without
regard to whether that person or entity receives any benefits under this
chapter. The State and its officers and employees shall not be liable for the
results of any investment, purchase of securities, loan, or other assistance
provided pursuant to this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
as authorizing any claim against the corporation in excess of any note, loan,
or other specific indebtedness incurred by the corporation or in excess of any
insurance policy acquired for the corporation or its employees. [L 2000, c 297,
pt of §22(1)]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next